Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.275

Washington professional educator standards board—Preparation program review.

The Washington professional educator standards board must periodically review approved preparation programs to assess whether and to what extent the programs are meeting knowledge, skill, and performance standards, and publish on its website the results of the review in a format that facilitates program comparison.

[ 2019 c 386 s 8.]